Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-305
Married woman.

A woman may while married sue and be sued in the same manner as if she were unmarried.

Laws 1871, § 3, p. 68;

R.S.1913, § 7586;

C.S.1922, § 8529;

C.S.1929, § 20-305;

R.S.1943, § 25-305.

Common-law doctrine of interspousal tort immunity is abrogated; husband or wife is not immune from tort liability to the other solely by the reason of that relationship. This case overrules Emerson v. Western Seed & Irrigation Co., 116 Neb. 180, 216 N.W. 297 (1927). Imig v. March, 203 Neb. 537, 279 N.W.2d 382 (1979).

Action by wife against husband for personal injuries is not authorized. Emerson v. Western Seed & Irr. Co., 116 Neb. 180, 216 N.W. 297 (1927), overruled by Imig v. March, 203 Neb. 537, 279 N.W.2d 382 (1979).

Statute of limitations runs against women during coverture. Murphy v. Evans City Steam Laundry Co., 52 Neb. 593, 72 N.W. 960 (1897).

Married woman may maintain action for personal injuries in her own home. City of Chadron v. Glover, 43 Neb. 732, 62 N.W. 62 (1895).

Wife may maintain action against husband for use and occupation of her real estate. Skinner v. Skinner, 38 Neb. 756, 57 N.W. 534 (1894).

Married woman, served with process, was bound by court's decree in registration proceedings under Torrens Act. Jones v. York County, 26 F.2d 623 (8th Cir. 1928).

Wife may maintain action for loss of consortium. Cooney v. Moomaw, 109 F.Supp. 448 (D. Neb. 1953).